Wyoming, session 2025, HB0125.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 31-11-102 is repealed.
Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
1